District of Columbia statutes.
26-1312

Stock, property, and liability to be security when fiduciary.

When any court shall appoint the said company a trustee, receiver, personal representative, special administrator, or such guardian or committee, or shall order the deposit of money or other valuable with said company, or where any individual or corporation shall appoint any of said companies a trustee, executor, assignee, or such guardian, the capital stock of said company subscribed for or taken, and all property owned by said company, together with the liability of the stockholders and officers as herein provided, shall be taken and considered as the security required by law for the faithful performance of its duties, and shall be absolutely liable in case of any default whatever.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1305, ch. 854, § 724
June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 207(d), 27 DCR 2155
1981 Ed., § 26-412.
1973 Ed., § 26-312.